winter/npfl094/hw-two-level-morphology/german.lexc
!!! german.lexc !!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +V +A +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl +Nom +Acc +Dat +Gen +Comp Sup+ +Pred +Att Uml+ @P.UML.ON@ @R.UML@ @D.UML@ @C.UML@ @P.SUP.ON@ @R.SUP@ @D.SUP@ @C.SUP@ @N.SUP@

LEXICON Root

Adjective ;
AdjectiveSup ;
NounStem ;

LEXICON AdjectiveSup

@P.SUP.ON@Sup+:@P.SUP.ON@am_ Adjective;

LEXICON Adjective

klein AdjDeg;
schwarz AdjDeg;
alt AdjDeg;
unrealistisch AdjDeg;
hoch AdjDeg;

LEXICON AdjDeg

@R.SUP@+Pred:@R.SUP@^sten	#;
@R.SUP@+Att:@R.SUP@^st		AdjArt;
@D.SUP@+Comp:@D.SUP@^er		AdjArt;

LEXICON AdjArt

+Def:0	AdjSoft;
+Indef:0	AdjIndef;
AdjHard;

LEXICON AdjSoft

+A+Nom+M:^e		#;
+A+Nom+F:^e		#;
+A+Nom+N:^e		#;
+A+Nom+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Acc+M:^en	#;
+A+Acc+F:^e		#;
+A+Acc+N:^e		#;
+A+Acc+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Dat+M:^en	#;
+A+Dat+F:^en	#;
+A+Dat+N:^en	#;
+A+Dat+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Gen+M:^en	#;
+A+Gen+F:^en	#;
+A+Gen+N:^en	#;
+A+Gen+Pl:^en	#;

LEXICON AdjIndef

+A+Nom+M:^er	#;
+A+Nom+F:^e		#;
+A+Nom+N:^es	#;
+A+Nom+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Acc+M:^en	#;
+A+Acc+F:^e		#;
+A+Acc+N:^es	#;
+A+Acc+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Dat+M:^en	#;
+A+Dat+F:^en	#;
+A+Dat+N:^en	#;
+A+Dat+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Gen+M:^en	#;
+A+Gen+F:^en	#;
+A+Gen+N:^en	#;
+A+Gen+Pl:^en	#;

LEXICON AdjHard

+A+Nom+M:^er	#;
+A+Nom+F:^e		#;
+A+Nom+N:^es	#;
+A+Nom+Pl:^e	#;

+A+Acc+M:^en	#;
+A+Acc+F:^e		#;
+A+Acc+N:^es	#;
+A+Acc+Pl:^e	#;

+A+Dat+M:^em	#;
+A+Dat+F:^er	#;
+A+Dat+N:^em	#;
+A+Dat+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Gen+M:^en	#;
+A+Gen+F:^er	#;
+A+Gen+N:^en	#;
+A+Gen+Pl:^er	#;

LEXICON NounStem

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

Strauß NM;
Reflex NM;
Name NM;

Gewürz NN;
Gas NN;

Senat NMW;
Assistent NMW;
Vize NMW;
Kunde NMW;
Junge NMW;
Elefant NMW;

Lappen NMno;

Hund@C.UML@ NMe;
Flaneur@C.UML@ NMe;
Ball NMe;

Mann NMer;

Katze NFen;
Einsammlung NFen;
Animation NFen;

Haus NNer;
Tuch NNer;

Auto NNs;
Taxi NNs;

LEXICON NMW

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^en	#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^en	#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^en	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^en	#;

LEXICON NMno

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^	#;

LEXICON NMe

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^e	#;

LEXICON NMn

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^n	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^n	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^n	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^n	#;

LEXICON NMer

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^er		#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^er		#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^er^n	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^er		#;

LEXICON NMs

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^s	#;

LEXICON NF

+N+Sg+Nom:^		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^		#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^e	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^e	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^e	#;

LEXICON NFno

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^		#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^	#;

LEXICON NFe

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^		#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^e	#;

LEXICON NFen

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^		#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^en	#;

LEXICON NFs

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^		#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^s	#;

LEXICON NN

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:0		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:0		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^er	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^er	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ern	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^er	#;

LEXICON NNno

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^	#;

LEXICON NNe

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^e	#;

LEXICON NNn

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^n	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^n	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^n	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^n	#;

LEXICON NNer

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^er		#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^er		#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^er^n	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^er		#;

LEXICON NNs

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^s	#;

LEXICON NNse

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^ses	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^se	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^se	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^se	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^se	#;
